North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-38 Income Tax
57-38-62.
Payment of estimated income tax.

An individual, estate, or trust that is subject to section 6654 of the Internal Revenue Code relating to a failure to pay federal estimated income tax shall, at the time prescribed in this chapter, pay estimated tax for the current taxable year. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an individual, estate, or trust whose net tax liability for the preceding taxable year was less than one thousand dollars is not required to pay estimated tax for the current taxable year. Married individuals who file a joint federal income tax return and are subject to section 6654 of the Internal Revenue Code must each be deemed to be subject to the federal provision. If payment of estimated tax is required, the individual, estate, or trust shall, at the time prescribed in this chapter, pay the lesser of the following:

An amount which, when added to the taxpayer’s withholding, equals ninety percent of the taxpayer’s current taxable year’s net tax liability.

An amount which, when added to the taxpayer’s withholding, equals one hundred percent of the taxpayer’s net tax liability for the immediately preceding taxable year.

This subdivision does not apply to any taxpayer who was not required by this chapter to file a return for the immediately preceding taxable year, to an individual who moved into this state during the immediately preceding taxable year, or to an estate or trust that was not in existence for the entire immediately preceding taxable year. The amount under this subdivision must be deemed to be equal to the amount in subdivision a if this part applies.

In order to satisfy the requirements of this subdivision, married individuals who are required to file separate state returns for the current taxable year but who were required to file a joint state return for the immediately preceding taxable year must each be required to pay estimated tax in an amount which, when added to the individual’s withholding, equals the net tax liability which would have been computed for the immediately preceding taxable year if separate state returns had been required to be filed.

In order to satisfy the requirements of this subdivision, married individuals who are required to file a joint state return for the current taxable year but were required to file separate state returns for the immediately preceding taxable year must be required to pay estimated tax in an amount which, when added to their withholding, equals the sum of their separate net tax liabilities for the immediately preceding taxable year.

A corporation shall, at the time prescribed in this chapter, pay estimated tax for the current taxable year if the corporation’s estimated tax can reasonably be expected to exceed five thousand dollars and if the corporation’s net tax liability for the immediately preceding taxable year exceeded five thousand dollars. If payment of estimated tax is required, the corporation shall, at the time prescribed in this chapter, pay the lesser of the following:

An amount which, when added to the corporation’s withholding, equals ninety percent of the corporation’s current taxable year’s net tax liability.

An amount which, when added to the corporation’s withholding, equals one hundred percent of the corporation’s net tax liability for the immediately preceding taxable year.

The provisions of section 57-38-45, except those provisions relating to the imposition of a penalty, apply in case of nonpayment, late payment, or underpayment of estimated tax. For purposes of applying the interest provisions of section 57-38-45, interest accrues on a per annum basis from the due date of an installment to the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the end of the current taxable year or, with respect to any portion of the estimated tax required to be paid, the date on which the portion thereof is paid, whichever date is earlier. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, no interest is due if the estimated tax paid on or before each due date under section 57-38-63 by a corporation is based on the annualized or adjusted seasonal method under section 6655 of the Internal Revenue Code. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, no interest is due if the estimated tax of an individual, estate, or trust is less than one thousand dollars per income tax return filed.

For purposes of this section, “estimated tax” means the amount that a taxpayer estimates to be income tax under this chapter for the current taxable year less the amount of any credits allowable, including tax withheld.

For purposes of this section, “net tax liability” means the amount of income tax computed for the taxable year as shown on the return less the amount of any credits allowable except tax withheld and estimated tax paid.

An individual or corporation may apply a tax overpayment from a preceding taxable year as an estimated tax payment on the individual’s or corporation’s behalf for the taxable year succeeding the overpayment. The individual or corporation may elect to apply the overpayment to specific estimated tax installments. If the individual or corporation does not specify the installment period toward which the overpayment is to be applied, the individual or corporation must be considered to have elected to apply the overpayment toward the first required estimated tax installment for the succeeding taxable year.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 458, § 5; 1977, ch. 536, § 5; 1983, ch. 641, § 1; 1985, ch. 637, § 1; 1987, ch. 695, § 7, R.M. approved March 18, 1987; 1987, ch. 773; 1987, ch. 701, § 1; 1989, ch. 712, § 3; 1991, ch. 674, § 3; 1995, ch. 561, § 3; 1995, ch. 567, § 1; 1995, ch. 568, § 1; 1997, ch. 493, § 4; 2001, ch. 533, § 1; 2013, ch. 456, § 1; 2015, ch. 432, § 8, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-38-63.
Due date for payment of estimated income tax.

A taxpayer shall pay no less than one-quarter of the estimated tax to the tax commissioner on April fifteenth, June fifteenth, and September fifteenth of the taxable year, and January fifteenth of the following taxable year; provided, that a taxpayer having a taxable year other than a calendar year shall pay the estimated tax on the fifteenth day of the fourth, sixth, and ninth months of the taxable year, and the fifteenth day of the first month of the following taxable year. In the case of a tax year that is for a period of less than one year, and the short tax year ends prior to any remaining due dates under this section, the final estimated tax payment is due on the fifteenth day of the last month of the short tax year. In the case of a tax year that is for a period of less than one hundred twenty days, no estimated tax payment is due.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 458, § 6; 1983, ch. 641, § 2; 1991, ch. 674, § 4; 2007, ch. 512, § 4.

57-38-64.
Application for quick refund of overpaid estimated tax by a corporation.

A corporation may, after the close of the taxable year and before the fifteenth day of the fourth month thereafter, file an application for an adjustment of an overpayment by it of estimated tax for the taxable year. A claim for credit or refund must be verified and paid as are other claims against the state. No application under this section may be allowed unless the amount of the adjustment exceeds five hundred dollars. No interest may accrue or be paid on any credit or refund allowed under this section as otherwise provided for under section 57-38-35.2.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 458, § 7; 1985, ch. 630, § 9; 1987, ch. 694, § 6; 1991, ch. 674, § 5.

57-38-65.
Exemption.

No transportation company is required to deduct and withhold with respect to wages paid to nonresident employees for work performed within North Dakota but whose total work during any one payroll period is performed within more than one state; provided, however, that any such employee furnish a certificate to the state tax commissioner that the employee will be taxable with respect to all such wages earned in North Dakota pursuant to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 458, § 8.

57-38-66.
Business and corporation privilege tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 612, § 3.

57-38-67.
Definitions applicable to sections 57-38-67 through 57-38-70. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 545, § 32.

57-38-68.
Income tax deduction for land sale to beginning farmers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 545, § 32.

57-38-69.
Rent from beginning farmers exempt from income tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 545, § 32.

57-38-70.
Claim for income tax deduction for land sale or rental to a beginning farmer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 545, § 32.

57-38-71.
Definitions applicable to sections 57-38-71 through 57-38-74. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 18, § 51.

57-38-72.
Income tax deduction for revenue-producing enterprise sale to beginning entrepreneur. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 18, § 51.

57-38-73.
Rent from beginning entrepreneur exempt from income tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 18, § 51.

57-38-74.
Claim for income tax deduction for revenue-producing enterprise sale or rental to a beginning entrepreneur. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 18, § 51.

57-38-75.
Rounding.

With respect to any amount required to be shown on any return, form, statement, or other document required to be filed with the tax commissioner and for purposes of amounts in tax tables prescribed under subsection 12 of section 57-38-30.3 and subsection 3 of section 57-38-59, the amount may be rounded to the nearest dollar. The cents must be disregarded if the cents amount to less than one-half dollar. If the cents amount to one-half dollar or more, the amount must be increased to the next whole dollar.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 529, § 1.